Utah statutes.
63A-4-206.   Limits on use of risk management data as evidence.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, any reports, recommendations, surveys, schedules, lists, or data compiled, or action taken or not taken by or at the request of the risk manager to identify, evaluate, or plan the safety enhancement or risk reduction of any potential accident sites or other hazards related to any entity covered by the Risk Management Fund may not be admitted into evidence in any court, or used for any other purposes in any action for damages arising from any occurrence at a location mentioned or addressed in those reports, recommendations, surveys, schedules, lists, or data.

